Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF681.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 611A.02, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Victims' rights. (a) The Office of Justice Programs in the Department of Public Safety shall update the two model notices of the rights of crime victims. (b) The initial notice of the rights of crime victims must be distributed by a peace officer to each victim, as defined in section 611A.01, at the time of initial contact with the victim. The notice must inform a victim of: (1) the victim's right to apply for reparations to cover losses, not including property losses, resulting from a violent crime and the telephone number to call to request an application; (2) the victim's right to request that the law enforcement agency withhold public access to data revealing the victim's identity under section 13.82, subdivision 17, paragraph (d); (3) the additional rights of domestic abuse victims as described in section 629.341; (4) information on the nearest crime victim assistance program or resource; (5) the victim's rights, if an offender is charged, to be informed of and participate in the prosecution process, including the right to request restitution; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (6) in homicide cases, information on rights and procedures available under sections 524.2-803, 524.3-614, and 524.3-615new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (7) the victim's right to be notified of offender letters of apology pursuant to section 611A.06, subdivision 3bnew text end . (c) A supplemental notice of the rights of crime victims must be distributed by the city or county attorney's office to each victim, within a reasonable time after the offender is charged or petitioned. This notice must inform a victim of all the rights of crime victims under this chapter. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 611A.06, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3b. new text end new text begin Notice of submission of apology letter. new text end new text begin The commissioner of corrections or other custodial authority shall make a good faith effort to notify the victim that the offender has submitted a letter of apology. Notices shall only be provided to victims who have submitted a written request for notification to the head of the county correctional facility in which the offender is confined, or if committed to the Department of Corrections, submitted a written request for the notice to the commissioner of corrections or an electronic request through the Department of Corrections electronic victim notification system. The good faith effort to notify the victim must occur within 90 days of the filing of the apology letter. new text end